California, session 20252026, AB1143.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 13159.5 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:13159.5. (a) The Office of the State Fire Marshal shall develop and make available on its internet website a Wildland-Urban Interface Fire Safety Building Standards Compliance training intended for use in the training of local building officials, builders, and fire service personnel. This training shall be updated as changes are made to Chapter 7A (commencing with Section 701A.1) of Part 2 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations, or any appropriate successor regulatory code, and shall include any pertinent mandates for emergency power backup, including, but not limited to, battery backup requirements for automatic garage door openers.(b) The Office of the State Fire Marshal shall develop and update on a regular basis a Wildland-Urban Interface Products listing of products and construction assemblies that comply with Chapter 7A (commencing with Section 701A.1) of Part 2 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations, or any appropriate successor regulatory code, for products such as the following:(1) Exterior wall siding and sheathing.(2) Exterior windows, skylights, and doors.(3) Vents, including eave and cornice vents.(4) Decking.(5) Treated lumber and ignition-resistant materials.(6) Roofing materials.(7) Emergency battery power backup for automatic garage door openers.(c) In researching and developing the products listing, the educational and training provisions, and developing the home hardening certification program under this section, the Office of the State Fire Marshal is authorized to expend funds from the Building Standards Administration Special Revolving Fund, upon an appropriation by the Legislature, pursuant to Section 18931.7.(d) On or before January 1, 2027, the State Fire Marshal’s Wildfire Mitigation Advisory Committee, established pursuant to Section 4209.4 of the Public Resources Code, shall develop a home hardening certification program that identifies home hardening measures, including defensible space, that can be implemented during renovation or property improvement projects, or both, to substantially reduce the risk of loss during a fire and bring existing building stock into alignment with the provisions adopted in the California Building Code (Part 7 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).SEC. 1.5. Section 13159.5 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:13159.5. (a) The Office of the State Fire Marshal shall develop and make available on its internet website a Wildland-Urban Interface Fire Safety Building Standards Compliance training intended for use in the training of local building officials, builders, and fire service personnel. This training shall be updated as changes are made to Chapter 7A (commencing with Section 701A.1) of Part 2 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations, or any appropriate successor regulatory code, and shall include any pertinent mandates for emergency power backup, including, but not limited to, battery backup requirements for automatic garage door openers.(b) The Office of the State Fire Marshal may allow certification of contractors who conduct defensible space, home hardening, fuel reduction, roadside clearance, and other contracting activities for wildfire resiliency efforts and who have completed the training program developed pursuant to Section 4291.6 of the Public Resources Code or an equivalent program.(c) The Office of the State Fire Marshal shall develop and update on a regular basis a Wildland-Urban Interface Products listing of products and construction assemblies that comply with Chapter 7A (commencing with Section 701A.1) of Part 2 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations, or any appropriate successor regulatory code, for products such as the following:(1) Exterior wall siding and sheathing.(2) Exterior windows, skylights, and doors.(3) Vents, including eave and cornice vents.(4) Decking.(5) Treated lumber and ignition-resistant materials.(6) Roofing materials.(7) Emergency battery power backup for automatic garage door openers.(d) In researching and developing the products listing, the educational and training provisions, and developing the home hardening certification program under this section, the Office of the State Fire Marshal is authorized to expend funds from the Building Standards Administration Special Revolving Fund, upon an appropriation by the Legislature, pursuant to Section 18931.7.(e) On or before January 1, 2027, the State Fire Marshal’s Wildfire Mitigation Advisory Committee, established pursuant to Section 4209.4 of the Public Resources Code, shall develop a home hardening certification program that identifies home hardening measures, including defensible space, that can be implemented during renovation or property improvement projects, or both, to substantially reduce the risk of loss during a fire and bring existing building stock into alignment with the provisions adopted in the California Building Code (Part 7 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).SEC. 2. Section 4209.4 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4209.4. (a) The Office of the State Fire Marshal shall establish the State Fire Marshal’s Wildfire Mitigation Advisory Committee to provide a public forum to solicit and consider public input on programs and activities pursuant to this article, to advise the Deputy Director of Community Wildfire Preparedness and Mitigation in developing and implementing programs and activities pursuant to this article, and to develop a home hardening certification program pursuant to Section 13159.5 of the Health and Safety Code.(b) The committee shall do all of the following:(1) Provide a consistent and regular means of communication on topics related to community wildfire preparedness and fire mitigation between the department, the Office of the State Fire Marshal, representatives of relevant industries, state agencies, fire service agencies, and other stakeholders.(2) Provide a forum for addressing wildfire preparedness and mitigation issues of statewide concern.(3) Share latest available research and best practices with regard to community fire preparedness and mitigation efforts.(4) Seek and provide comments and specific input on proposed programs, policies, guidelines, budget, and technical issues, and inform local agencies and the public of applicable new laws and regulations.(5) Provide and receive updates and feedback regarding the programs operated by the Office of the State Fire Marshal pursuant to this article.(c) Members of the committee shall be all of the following:(1) The director of the department, or their designee.(2) The director of the Department of Conservation, or their designee.(3) The Director of the Office of Energy Infrastructure Safety, or their designee.(4) The chair of the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection, or their designee.(5) The State Fire Marshal, or their designee.(6) The Director of Emergency Services, or their designee.(7) The Insurance Commissioner, or their designee.(8) The Director of State Planning and Research, or their designee.(9) A representative from the California Fire Safe Council.(10) A representative from the insurance industry or an insurance research organization.(11) A local fire service representative.(12) A representative from the building industry.(13) A representative from the University of California Cooperative Extension.(14) A representative from the California Fire Science Consortium.(15) Any other appropriate stakeholders, including representatives from local governmental agencies, as decided by the State Fire Marshal.(d) The committee shall meet monthly.(e) The members of the committee shall serve without compensation, but each member shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.(f) The chairperson of the committee shall be the State Fire Marshal.SEC. 3. Section 1.5 of this bill incorporates amendments to Section 13159.5 of the Health and Safety Code proposed by both this bill and Senate Bill 514. That section of this bill shall only become operative if (1) both bills are enacted and become effective on or before January 1, 2026, (2) each bill amends Section 13159.5 of the Health and Safety Code, and (3) this bill is enacted after Senate Bill 514, in which case Section 1 of this bill shall not become operative.